Utah statutes.
35A-8-1403.   Eligibility criteria.

(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department may make rules establishing eligibility criteria for recipients of assistance under this part.

(2)  A recipient of assistance under this part shall demonstrate:

(a)  that the recipient's family, household, or individual income is 150% of the federal poverty level or less;

(b)  that the recipient is responsible for paying the recipient's home energy costs; and

(c)  compliance with any rules established by the department under this section.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

